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DI3s9-07

DTC PO 180/39Fuel Temperature Sensor Circuit
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The fuel temperature sensor senses the fuel temperature. A
thermistor built into the sensor changes the resistance value
(Fig.1) according to the fuel temperature. The lower the fuel tempera-
30 r ture, the greater the thermistor resistance value, and the higher
20 the fuel temperature, the lower the thermistor resistance value
10 b Acceptable (See Fig.1).
5 The fuel temperature sensor is connected to the engine ECU
i 3 b (see next page). The 5 V power source voltage in the engine
8 oL ECU is applied to the fuel temperature sensor from the terminal
g L THF via resistor R. That is, the resistor R and the fuel tempera-
@ = ture sensor are connected in series. When the resistance value
@C 05 of the fuel temperature sensor changes, in accordance with
0.3 - changes in the fuel temperature, the potential at the terminal
0.2 1 THF also changes. Based on this signal, the engine ECU in-
01 L creases the fuel injection volume to improve driveability during
T S ! low engine revolution and high fuel temperature.
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DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area
* Openorshortinfueltemp. sensor circuit
P0180/39 Openorshortinfueltemp. sensor circuitfor 0.5 sec. ormore * Fueltemp. sensor
*EngineECU
HINT:

When DTC P0180/39 is detected, check the engine coolant temperature by entering the following menus
on the intelligent tester Il: Powertrain / Engine and ECT / Data List / Fuel Temp.

Temperature displayed Malfunction
-40°C (-40°F) Open circuit
140° C (284 ° F) ormore Short circuit
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:

. If DTCs related to different systems that have terminal E2 as the ground terminal are output simulta-
neously, terminal E2 may have an open circuit.
. Read freeze frame data using the intelligent tester Il. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions
when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the
vehicle was running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, and other data from the time the

malfunction occurred.

When using intelligent tester II:

1 Connect intelligent tester Il, and read value of fuel temperature.

PREPARATION:

(@) Connect the intelligent tester Il to the DLCS.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the intelligent tester 1l main switch ON.

CHECK:

Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.

OK:

Same as actual fuel temperature.

HINT:

. If there is an open circuit, the intelligent tester Il indicates -40° C (-40°F).
. If there is a short circuit, the intelligent tester Il indicates 140° C (284° F) or more.

@

NG>

-40°C (-40°F)...Gotostep 2.
140°C (284 ° F) ormore... Goto step 4.

DI-4).

Check for intermittent problems (See page
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2 | Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

@ON

Fuel Engine ECU

Temp. Sensor

LiC &

A00214

@

PREPARATION:

(@) Disconnect the fuel temp. sensor connector.
(b) Connect sensor wire harness terminals together.
(c) Turntheignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.
OK:
Temperature value: 140°C (284 ° F) or more

OK Confirm good connection at sensor.
If OK, replace fuel temp. sensor.

3 | Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

Engine ECU

Fuel Temp. Sensor
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PREPARATION:
(@ Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Connectbetweenterminals THF and E2 ofthe engine
ECU connector.
HINT:
Fuel temp. sensor connector is disconnected. Before checking,
do avisual and contact pressure check for the engine ECU con-
nector (see page IN-19).
(¢)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester Il.
OK:
Temperature value: 140°C (284 ° F) or more

OK Open in harness between terminal E2 or THF, re-
pair or replace harness.

OK, replace engine ECU.

Confirm good connection at engine ECU. If
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4 | Check for short in harness or engine ECU.
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PREPARATION:
(@) Disconnect the fuel temp. sensor connector.
(b) Turntheignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Readthetemperature value ontheintelligenttester l.
OK:

Temperature value: -40°C (-40°F)

OK> place fueltemp. sensor.

5 | Check for short in harness or engine ECU.

Engine ECU
Fuel Temp. Sensor
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E16 Connector

A23887

PREPARATION:
(a) Removethe glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the E16 connector of the engine ECU.
HINT:
Fuel temp. sensor connector is disconnected.
(¢)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.
OK:
Temperature value: -40°C (-40°F)

OKé pair or replace harness or connector.

IN-19).

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
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When not using intelligent tester II:

1

Check voltage between terminals THF and E2 of engine ECU connector.

PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
‘Fg‘jﬁ#%{—lhllll 3 |||||||||||||I| m

T |,

0|0 O 000 .
LA O LD Measure the voltage between terminals THF and E2 of the en-

W W W gine ECU connecter.

B
B

OK:
THW E2
Fuel temp. Voltage
Y A23883 20°C (68°F) (Engine is cool) 0.2t03.8V
80°C (176°F) (Engine is hot) 0.1to 1.5V

(See page DI-4).

OK> Check for intermittent problems

B

Check fuel temp. sensor (See Pub. No. RM617E on page ED-6).

NG> Replace fuel temp. sensor.

3

Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
fuel temp. sensor (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

@

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN-19).
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